Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-2612
First responder; qualifying child; tuition waiver; eligibility criteria.

In order for a first responder or a first responder's qualifying child to be eligible to receive a tuition waiver under section 85-2620, the first responder must meet the following criteria:

(1) If the first responder is a law enforcement officer, such officer must possess a law enforcement officer certificate under sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19. This subdivision shall not be satisfied if the Nebraska Police Standards Advisory Council has revoked or suspended such certificate or limited certificate under subdivision (6) of section 81-1403 and the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice has reviewed and approved such revocation or suspension;

(2) If the first responder is a firefighter, such firefighter must maintain satisfactory performance with such firefighter's fire department;

(3) If the first responder is a correctional officer, such officer must maintain satisfactory performance as a correctional officer; or

(4) If the first responder is a youth detention officer, such officer must maintain satisfactory performance as a youth detention officer.

Laws 2025, LB608, § 5.